Nevada, session 83, SB449.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. NRS 280.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
280.125 1. The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit a
participating political subdivision from establishing and
administering the following units of specialized law enforcement:
(a) A unit consisting of animal control officers.
(b) A unit consisting of marshals.
(c) A unit consisting of park rangers.
(d) A unit for the investigation of arson.
(e) A unit for the enforcement of laws relating to the licensure of
businesses.
(f) A unit for the enforcement of nonmoving traffic laws.
(g) A unit consisting of officers that provide public safety
services.
-
*SB449_R1*

– 3 –
2. Except as otherwise limited in subsection 3, the jurisdiction
and authority of any units of specialized law enforcement
established pursuant to subsection 1 is concurrent with the authority
and jurisdiction of the metropolitan police department.
3. The authority and jurisdiction of a unit consisting of
marshals , [or] park rangers or officers that provide public safety
services is limited to:
(a) The issuance of citations in accordance with the provisions
of NRS 171.17751;
(b) The enforcement of state laws and city and county
ordinances on real property owned, leased or otherwise under the
control of the participating political subdivision;
(c) The service of warrants of arrest issued pursuant to
NRS 5.060;
(d) The removal of abandoned vehicles as authorized by NRS
487.230; [and]
(e) The duties set forth in NRS 171.1223 [.] ; and
(f) Any purpose authorized in an interlocal or cooperative
agreement entered into by the sheriff of the county in which the
metropolitan police department is located and a participating
political subdivision.
Sec. 3. NRS 5.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
5.060 1. Municipal judges and municipal courts may issue all
legal process, writs and warrants necessary and proper to the
complete exercise of their powers.
2. All warrants issued by the municipal court must run to any
sheriff or constable of the county, the marshal or any police officer
of the city, or a marshal , [or] park ranger or officer who is part of a
unit of specialized law enforcement established pursuant to
NRS 280.125.
3. Any constable or sheriff may serve any process or make any
arrest authorized to be made by any officer of a city.
Sec. 4. NRS 171.1223 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.1223 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, in
a county whose population is 100,000 or more, a peace officer with
limited jurisdiction who witnesses a category A felony being
committed or attempted in the officer’s presence, or has reasonable
cause for believing a person has committed or attempted to commit
a category A felony in an area that is within the officer’s
jurisdiction, shall immediately notify the primary law enforcement
agency in the city or county, as appropriate, where the offense or
attempted offense was committed.
2. Upon arrival of an officer from the primary law enforcement
agency notified pursuant to subsection 1, a peace officer with
limited jurisdiction shall immediately transfer the investigation of
-
*SB449_R1*

– 4 –
the offense or attempted offense to the primary law enforcement
agency.
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not:
(a) Apply to an offense or attempted offense that is a
misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor or felony other than a category A
felony;
(b) Apply to an officer of the Nevada Highway Patrol, a member
of the police department of the Nevada System of Higher Education,
an agent of the Investigation Division of the Department of Public
Safety or a ranger of the Division of State Parks of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources;
(c) Apply to a peace officer with limited jurisdiction if an
interlocal agreement between the officer’s employer and the primary
law enforcement agency in the city or county in which a category A
felony was committed or attempted authorizes the peace officer with
limited jurisdiction to respond to and investigate the felony without
immediately notifying the primary law enforcement agency; or
(d) Prohibit a peace officer with limited jurisdiction from:
(1) Contacting a primary law enforcement agency for
assistance with an offense that is a misdemeanor, gross
misdemeanor or felony that is not a category A felony; or
(2) Responding to a category A felony until the appropriate
primary law enforcement agency arrives at the location where the
felony was allegedly committed or attempted, including, without
limitation, taking any appropriate action to provide assistance to a
victim of the felony, to apprehend the person suspected of
committing or attempting to commit the felony, to secure the
location where the felony was allegedly committed or attempted and
to protect the life and safety of the peace officer and any other
person present at that location.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Peace officer with limited jurisdiction” means:
(1) A school police officer who is appointed or employed
pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 391.281;
(2) An airport guard or police officer who is appointed
pursuant to NRS 496.130;
(3) A person employed to provide police services for an
airport authority created by a special act of the Legislature; and
(4) A marshal , [or] park ranger or officer who is part of a
unit of specialized law enforcement established pursuant to
NRS 280.125.
(b) “Primary law enforcement agency” means:
(1) A police department of an incorporated city;
(2) The sheriff’s office of a county; or
-
*SB449_R1*

– 5 –
(3) If the county is within the jurisdiction of a metropolitan
police department, the metropolitan police department.
Sec. 5. NRS 171.1455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.1455 1. A peace officer shall use de-escalation
techniques and alternatives to the use of force whenever possible or
appropriate and consistent with his or her training, including,
without limitation, advisements, warnings, verbal persuasion and
other tactics. If it is necessary for the peace officer to use force, the
peace officer must:
(a) If it is possible to do so safely, identify himself or herself as
a peace officer through verbal commands, visual identification,
including, without limitation, a clearly marked uniform or vehicle,
or other reasonable means; and
(b) Use only the level of force that is objectively reasonable
under the circumstances to bring an incident or person under control
and safely accomplish a lawful purpose. The level of force used by
the officer must, to the extent feasible:
(1) Be balanced against the level of force or resistance
exhibited by the person; and
(2) Be carefully controlled.
2. A peace officer may, after giving a warning, if feasible, use
deadly force to effect the arrest of a person only if there is probable
cause to believe that the person:
(a) Has committed a felony which involves the infliction or
threat of serious bodily harm or the use of deadly force; or
(b) Poses an imminent threat of serious bodily harm or death to
the peace officer or to others.
3. Each law enforcement agency shall adopt a written policy
and provide training to a peace officer regarding the potential threat
of serious bodily harm or death to the peace officer or others from a
person who:
(a) Is known or reasonably believed not to be armed with a
deadly weapon; and
(b) Is known or reasonably believed by the peace officer to be:
(1) Under 13 years of age;
(2) Over 70 years of age;
(3) Physically frail;
(4) Mentally or physically disabled;
(5) Pregnant;
(6) Suffering from a mental or behavioral health issue; or
(7) Experiencing a medical emergency.
4. The written policy adopted and training provided pursuant to
subsection 3 must reflect the best practices with respect to the use of
force on the persons described in that subsection.
-
*SB449_R1*

– 6 –
5. In addition to any other information required pursuant to
subsection 3, the written policy must include, without limitation:
(a) Guidelines for the use of force;
(b) Guidelines for the use of deadly force;
(c) A requirement that peace officers utilize de-escalation
techniques, crisis intervention and other alternatives to force when
feasible;
(d) A requirement that peace officers utilize de-escalation
techniques for responding to persons with mental illness or
experiencing a behavioral health crisis;
(e) A requirement that the law enforcement agency, when
feasible, send a peace officer who has been trained in crisis
intervention to respond to an incident involving a person who has
made suicidal statements;
(f) Factors for evaluating and reviewing all incidents which
require the use of force; and
(g) The date on which the written policy was adopted by the law
enforcement agency.
6. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) A police department of an incorporated city;
(2) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(3) A metropolitan police department;
(4) The Department of Corrections;
(5) The police department for the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
(6) Any political subdivision of this State employing park
rangers or officers described in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of
NRS 280.125 to enforce laws within its jurisdiction; or
(7) Any political subdivision of this State which has as its
primary duty the enforcement of law and which employs peace
officers pursuant to NRS 289.150 to 289.360, inclusive, to fulfill its
duty.
(b) “Level of force” means an escalating series of actions a
peace officer may use to resolve or control a situation or person
depending on the intensity of the situation or resistance of the
person that ranges from the use of no force to the use of deadly
force.
Sec. 6. NRS 171.17751 is hereby amended to read as follows:
171.17751 1. Any board of county commissioners or
governing body of a city may designate the chief officer of the
organized fire department or any employees designated by the chief
officer, and certain of its inspectors of solid waste management,
building, housing and licensing inspectors, zoning enforcement
-
*SB449_R1*

– 7 –
officers, parking enforcement officers, animal control officers,
traffic engineers, marshals , [and] park rangers and officers of units
of specialized law enforcement established pursuant to NRS
280.125, and other persons charged with the enforcement of county
or city ordinances, to prepare, sign and serve written citations on
persons accused of violating a county or city ordinance.
2. The Chief Medical Officer and the health officer of each
county, district and city may designate certain employees to prepare,
sign and serve written citations on persons accused of violating any
law, ordinance or regulation of a board of health that relates to
public health.
3. The Administrator of the Housing Division of the
Department of Business and Industry may designate certain
employees to prepare, sign and serve written citations on persons
accused of violating any law or regulation of the Division relating to
the provisions of chapters 118B, 461, 461A and 489 of NRS.
4. The State Contractors’ Board may designate certain of its
employees to prepare, sign and serve written citations on persons
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 624.115.
5. An employee designated pursuant to this section:
(a) May exercise the authority to prepare, sign and serve
citations only within the field of enforcement in which the employee
works;
(b) May, if employed by a city or county, prepare, sign and
serve a citation only to enforce an ordinance of the city or county by
which the employee is employed; and
(c) Shall comply with the provisions of NRS 171.1773.
Sec. 7. NRS 193.309 is hereby amended to read as follows:
193.309 1. Each law enforcement agency shall annually
make available to the public and on a monthly basis submit to the
Central Repository a report that includes, without limitation, a
compilation of statistics relating to incidents involving the use of
force that occurred during the immediately preceding calendar year,
or month, as applicable, including, without limitation:
(a) The number of complaints against peace officers employed
by the law enforcement agency relating to the use of force and the
number of such complaints that were substantiated; and
(b) A compilation of statistics relating to incidents involving the
use of force that, for each incident, includes, without limitation, all
information collected by the National Use-of-Force Data Collection
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
2. Each law enforcement agency shall submit the report
required pursuant to subsection 1 in a manner approved by the
Director of the Department of Public Safety and in accordance with
the policies, procedures and definitions of the Department.
-
*SB449_R1*

– 8 –
3. The Central Repository shall make the use-of-force data
submitted by each law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection 1
available for access by the public on the Internet website of the
Central Repository.
4. The Central Repository may accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section.
5. To the extent of legislative appropriation, the Office of the
Attorney General shall:
(a) Review the use-of-force data that is publicly available on the
Internet website of the Central Repository;
(b) Prepare a report containing any conclusions or
recommendations resulting from its review; and
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, submit to the
Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature the report prepared pursuant to
paragraph (b).
6. Each law enforcement agency in this State shall participate
in the National Use-of-Force Data Collection of the Federal Bureau
of Investigation.
7. Information collected pursuant to this section must not be
introduced into evidence or otherwise used in any way against a
peace officer during a criminal proceeding.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Central Repository” means the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(2) A metropolitan police department;
(3) A police department of an incorporated city;
(4) The Department of Corrections;
(5) The police department for the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
(6) Any political subdivision of this State employing park
rangers or officers described in paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of
NRS 280.125 to enforce laws within its jurisdiction; or
(7) Any political subdivision of this State which has as its
primary duty the enforcement of law and which employs peace
officers to fulfill its duty.
Sec. 8. Chapter 289 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Subject to the provisions of NRS 280.125, officers of a unit
established pursuant to paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS
280.125 have the powers of a peace officer.
-
*SB449_R1*

– 9 –
Sec. 9. NRS 289.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
289.830 1. A law enforcement agency shall require
uniformed peace officers that it employs and who routinely interact
with the public to wear a portable event recording device while on
duty. Each law enforcement agency shall adopt policies and
procedures governing the use of portable event recording devices,
which must include, without limitation:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), requiring
activation of a portable event recording device whenever a peace
officer is responding to a call for service or at the initiation of any
other law enforcement or investigative encounter between a
uniformed peace officer and a member of the public;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), prohibiting
deactivation of a portable event recording device until the
conclusion of a law enforcement or investigative encounter;
(c) Prohibiting the recording of general activity;
(d) Protecting the privacy of persons:
(1) In a private residence;
(2) Seeking to report a crime or provide information
regarding a crime or ongoing investigation anonymously; or
(3) Claiming to be a victim of a crime;
(e) Requiring that any video recorded by a portable event
recording device must be retained by the law enforcement agency
for not less than 15 days; and
(f) Establishing disciplinary rules for peace officers who:
(1) Fail to operate a portable event recording device in
accordance with any departmental policies;
(2) Intentionally manipulate a video recorded by a portable
event recording device; or
(3) Prematurely erase a video recorded by a portable event
recording device.
2. Any record made by a portable event recording device
pursuant to this section is a public record which may be:
(a) Requested only on a per incident basis; and
(b) Available for inspection only at the location where the
record is held if the record contains confidential information that
may not otherwise be redacted.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(2) A metropolitan police department;
(3) A police department of an incorporated city;
(4) A department, division or municipal court of a city or
town that employs marshals;
-
*SB449_R1*

– 10 –
(5) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more and in
which a metropolitan police department has been organized
pursuant to chapter 280 of NRS, a department or division
established by a participating political subdivision to provide
public safety services that employs officers pursuant to paragraph
(g) of subsection 1 of NRS 280.125;
(6) The Nevada Highway Patrol; or
[(6)] (7) A board of trustees of any county school district
that employs or appoints school police officers.
(b) “Portable event recording device” means a device issued to a
peace officer by a law enforcement agency to be worn on his or her
body and which records both audio and visual events occurring
during an encounter with a member of the public while performing
his or her duties as a peace officer.
Sec. 10. NRS 487.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
487.230 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 487.235,
any sheriff or designee of a sheriff, constable, member of the
Nevada Highway Patrol, officer of the Legislative Police,
investigator of the Division of Compliance Enforcement of the
Department, personnel of the Capitol Police Division of the
Department of Public Safety, designated employees of the Housing
Division of the Department of Business and Industry, special
investigator employed by the office of a district attorney, marshal or
police officer of a city or town or his or her designee, a marshal ,
[or] park ranger or officer who is part of a unit of specialized law
enforcement established pursuant to NRS 280.125, or any other
person charged with the enforcement of county or city ordinances
who has reason to believe that a vehicle has been abandoned on
public property in his or her jurisdiction may remove the vehicle
from that property or cause the vehicle to be removed from that
property. At the request of the owner or person in possession or
control of private property who has reason to believe that a vehicle
has been abandoned on his or her property, the vehicle may be
removed by the operator of a tow car or an automobile wrecker from
that private property.
2. A person who authorizes the removal of an abandoned
vehicle pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Have the vehicle taken to the nearest garage or other place
designated for storage by:
(1) The state agency or political subdivision making the
request if the vehicle is removed from public property.
(2) The owner or person in possession or control of the
property if the vehicle is removed from private property.
(b) Make all practical inquiries to ascertain if the vehicle is
stolen by checking the license plate number, vehicle identification
-
*SB449_R1*

– 11 –
number and other available information which will aid in identifying
the registered and legal owner of the vehicle and supply the
information to the person who is storing the vehicle.
Sec. 11. NRS 617.135 is hereby amended to read as follows:
617.135 “Police officer” includes:
1. A sheriff, deputy sheriff, officer of a metropolitan police
department or city police officer;
2. A chief, inspector, supervisor, commercial officer or trooper
of the Nevada Highway Patrol Division of the Department of Public
Safety;
3. A chief, investigator or agent of the Investigation Division
of the Department of Public Safety;
4. A chief, supervisor, investigator or training officer of the
Training Division of the Department of Public Safety;
5. A chief or investigator of an office of the Department of
Public Safety that conducts internal investigations of employees of
the Department of Public Safety or investigates other issues relating
to the professional responsibility of those employees;
6. A chief or investigator of the Department of Public Safety
whose duties include, without limitation:
(a) The execution, administration or enforcement of the
provisions of chapter 179A of NRS; and
(b) The provision of technology support services to the Director
and the divisions of the Department of Public Safety;
7. An officer or investigator of the Section for the Control of
Emissions From Vehicles and the Enforcement of Matters Related
to the Use of Special Fuel of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
8. An investigator of the Division of Compliance Enforcement
of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
9. A member of the police department of the Nevada System of
Higher Education;
10. A:
(a) Uniformed employee of; or
(b) Forensic specialist employed by,
 the Department of Corrections whose position requires regular
and frequent contact with the offenders imprisoned and subjects the
employee to recall in emergencies;
11. A parole and probation officer of the Division of Parole
and Probation of the Department of Public Safety;
12. A forensic specialist or correctional officer employed by
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services at facilities for mentally disordered
offenders;
13. The State Fire Marshal and his or her assistant and
deputies;
-
*SB449_R1*

– 12 –
14. A game warden of the Department of Wildlife who has the
powers of a peace officer pursuant to NRS 289.280;
15. A ranger or employee of the Division of State Parks of the
State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources who has
the powers of a peace officer pursuant to NRS 289.260;
16. An officer of a unit established pursuant to paragraph (g)
of subsection 1 of NRS 280.125 who has the powers of a peace
officer pursuant to section 8 of this act;
17. A bailiff or a deputy marshal of the district court or justice
court whose duties require him or her to carry a weapon and to make
arrests; and
[17.] 18. An agricultural police officer appointed by the
Director of the State Department of Agriculture pursuant to NRS
561.225 who has the powers of a peace officer pursuant to
NRS 289.290.
H
-
*SB449_R1*